Maryland, session 2026, HB0510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–415.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT OR
ARRANGEMENT WITH AN APPROPRIATE AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE
COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA TO OBTAIN AND REGULARLY UPDATE INFORMATION
REGARDING MOTOR VEHICLES THAT:
(1) ARE OWNED BY RESIDENTS OF THE STATE; AND
(2) ARE IMPROPERLY REGISTERED IN THE COMMONWEALTH OF
VIRGINIA.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(1) COMPILE THE INFORMATION OBTAINED UNDER THIS SECTION
INTO A SEARCHABLE DATABASE; AND
(2) MAKE THE DATABASE AVAILABLE TO ANY STATE OR LOCAL
ENTITY SEEKING ACCESS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ISSUING CITATIONS TO THE OWNERS
OR DRIVERS OF MOTOR VEHICLES FOR VIOLATIONS RECORDED BY:
(I) SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–809 OF THIS
ARTICLE; AND
(II) WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEMS UNDER § 21–810 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this

HOUSE BILL 510 3
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) [and], (iii), AND (IV) of
this paragraph, a civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed:
1. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $40;
2. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $70;
3. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $120;
4. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $230; and
5. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by 40 miles per hour or more, $425.
(ii) A civil penalty under this paragraph for a violation recorded on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695 in Baltimore County may not exceed
$40.
(iii) 1. This paragraph applies to a civil penalty assessed to the
owner or driver of a motor vehicle that is recorded by a speed monitoring system while
being operated on Maryland Route 210 (Piscataway Highway) in Prince George’s County
in violation of this subtitle.
2. [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (IV)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE maximum civil penalty under this subparagraph is as follows:
A. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $40;
B. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $70;
C. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $120;
D. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $230; or
E. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by 40
miles per hour or more, $425.

HOUSE BILL 510
(IV) 1. THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES TO A CIVIL PENALTY
ASSESSED TO THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT IS RECORDED BY
A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM WHILE BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE, IF:
A. THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS A RESIDENT
OF THE STATE; AND
B. THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS IMPROPERLY REGISTERED IN
THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA.
2. THE MAXIMUM CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH IS:
A. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 12 AND 15, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $250;
B. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 16 AND 19, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $500;
C. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 20 AND 29, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $750;
D. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 30 AND 39, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $1,000; OR
E. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY 40 MILES PER HOUR OR MORE, $1,250.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (4) of this
subsection, an agency shall mail to an owner liable under subsection (c) of this section a
citation that shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;

HOUSE BILL 510 5
(ii) The registration number of the motor vehicle involved in the
violation;
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) The location where the violation occurred;
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty should be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a duly authorized law enforcement officer
or a technician employed by or under contract with an agency that, based on inspection of
recorded images, the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of this subtitle;
(ix) A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of
this subtitle;
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the citation may be contested
in the District Court; [and]
(xi) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability in a timely manner:
1. Is an admission of liability;
2. May result in the refusal by the Administration to register
the motor vehicle; and
3. May result in the suspension of the motor vehicle
registration; AND
(XII) IF THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS A RESIDENT OF
THE STATE AND THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS IMPROPERLY REGISTERED IN THE
COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO
BE LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT DRIVING A MOTOR VEHICLE ON A HIGHWAY
WITHOUT PROPER REGISTRATION IS A VIOLATION OF § 13–402 OF THIS ARTICLE.
21–810.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 510
(7) “Work zone speed control system” means a device that:
(i) Has one or more motor vehicle sensors connected to a camera
system capable of producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at or above a
predetermined speed in or approaching a work zone; and
(ii) Is equipped with flashing blue lights.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if an image of the motor
vehicle is recorded by a work zone speed control system in accordance with subsection (b)
of this section while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) of this
subsection, a civil penalty under this subsection is:
(i) If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $60;
(ii) If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $80;
(iii) If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $140;
(iv) If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $270; AND
(v) If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by 40 miles per hour or more, $500.
(3) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES TO A CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED
TO THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT IS RECORDED BY A WORK
ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM WHILE BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE, IF:
1. THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS A RESIDENT
OF THE STATE; AND
2. THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS IMPROPERLY REGISTERED IN
THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS:

HOUSE BILL 510 7
1. IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 12 AND 15, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $300;
2. IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 16 AND 19, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $450;
3. IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 20 AND 29, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $600;
4. IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 30 AND 39, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $750; AND
5. IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY 40 MILES PER HOUR OR MORE,
$900.
(4) If a citation is for a violation recorded when workers were present in
the work zone, the civil penalty shall be double the amount that would otherwise apply
under paragraph (2) OR (3) of this subsection.
[(4)] (5) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall:
(i) Prescribe a uniform citation form consistent with subsection
(d)(1) of this section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) Indicate on the citation the amount of the civil penalty to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (4) of this
subsection, a local police department, State police department, or police department
contractor shall mail to the owner liable under subsection (c) of this section a citation that
shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(ii) The registration number of the motor vehicle involved in the
violation;
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) The location where the violation occurred;

HOUSE BILL 510
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) At least one recorded image of the vehicle with a data bar
imprinted on each image that includes the speed of the vehicle and the date and time the
image was recorded;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty should be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a police officer employed by the local police
department or State police department that, based on inspection of recorded images, the
motor vehicle was being operated in violation of this subtitle;
(ix) A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of
this subtitle;
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the citation may be contested
in the District Court; [and]
(xi) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability in a timely manner:
1. Is an admission of liability;
2. May result in the refusal to register the motor vehicle; and
3. May result in the suspension of the motor vehicle
registration; AND
(XII) IF THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS A RESIDENT OF
THE STATE AND THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS IMPROPERLY REGISTERED IN THE
COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO
BE LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT DRIVING A MOTOR VEHICLE ON A HIGHWAY
WITHOUT PROPER REGISTRATION IS A VIOLATION OF § 13–402 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.